Georgia statutes. TITLE 35 Law Enforcement Officers and Agencies
CHAPTER 6 State Victim Services Commission

Cross references.

Victim assistance coordinator, §

15-18-14.2

.

Funding for local victim assistance projects, T. 15, C. 21, A. 8.

Victim compensation, T. 17, C. 15.

Law reviews.

For article, “Disrupting Victim Exploitation,” see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 805 (2018).

35-6-1.
Creation and responsibility.

There is created the State Victim Services Commission. Such commission shall be responsible for developing a comprehensive state plan for assisting men, women, and children who are victims of crime through the distribution of the fine surcharges imposed for local victim assistance programs.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, Ex. Sess., p. ES3, § 25.

Cross references.

Referral to victim assistance organizations of child suspected of being a victim of sexual exploitation or trafficking, §

15-11-130.1

.

35-6-2.
Membership of commission; terms of members; procedure.

The State Victim Services Commission shall consist of 14 members as follows:

The executive director of the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of Georgia or his or her designee;

The president of the Georgia Sheriffs’ Association or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council or his or her designee;

The chairperson of the Georgia Commission on Family Violence or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Georgia Coalition Against Domestic Violence or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Association County Commissioners of Georgia or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Children’s Advocacy Centers of Georgia or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Georgia Municipal Association or his or her designee;

The executive director of the Georgia Network to End Sexual Assault or his or her designee;

A district attorney appointed by the Prosecuting Attorneys’ Council of Georgia;

One member appointed by the Governor;

One member appointed by the Lieutenant Governor; and

One member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The letter of appointment shall set out the term for which each member is appointed. Thereafter, each member shall be appointed for a term of two years, and no member may serve more than two consecutive terms. All vacancies shall be filled for the unexpired term by an appointee of the original appointing official.

The commission shall elect a chairperson, vice chairperson, and a secretary from among its members for terms of two years, and any member shall be eligible for successive election to such office by the commission.

The commission shall hold regular meetings at such times and such places as it may deem necessary or convenient to enable the commission to exercise fully and effectively its powers, perform its duties, and accomplish the objectives and purposes of this chapter. Special meetings may be called by the chairperson or a majority of the members of the commission.

A quorum for transacting business shall be determined by the members of the commission.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation or expense reimbursement.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, Ex. Sess., p. ES3, § 25; Ga. L. 2019, p. 919, § 18-2/HB 553.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “14 members” for “15 members” in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a); deleted former paragraph (a)(9), which read: “The executive director of the Georgia Association of Homes and Services for Children or his or her designee;”; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(10) through (a)(15) as present paragraphs (a)(9) through (a)(14), respectively; and deleted the former first and second sentences of subsection (b), which read: “The term of appointment shall be three years for initial members appointed in accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (13) and (15) of subsection (a) of this Code section. The term of appointment shall be two years for initial members appointed in accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (12) and (14) of subsection (a) of this Code section.”

35-6-3.
Powers and duties of commission; ombudsman program.

The State Victim Services Commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To review the financial reports submitted pursuant to Code Section 15-21-132 concerning local victim assistance programs;

To assess the degree of compliance of the courts in collecting and forwarding funds authorized to be collected pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 21 of Title 15;

To review and determine the extent to which county governing authorities collect funds from the courts and distribute such funds to victim services programs;

To assess the extent to which such funds are utilized by such victim services programs to provide direct services to victims of crimes;

To recommend changes in legislation that will ensure compliance in the collection, distribution, and use of victim assistance funds as needed; and

To recommend as necessary and advisable rules and regulations for the collection and distribution of funds by court officers pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 21 of Title 15.

The commission may establish a victim services ombudsman program, provided that funds are appropriated by the General Assembly for such purpose or the commission receives sufficient funds from private grants or donations to fund such program.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, Ex. Sess., p. ES3, § 25.

35-6-4.
Responsibility of state auditor; inspection of documentation.

The state auditor is authorized and directed to assist the State Victim Services Commission in the discharge of its duties set forth in this chapter.

Any victim assistance program, including programs operated by public officers, that receives funds pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 21 of Title 15 shall make available to the State Victim Services Commission, the state auditor, or such other persons as the State Victim Services Commission may designate all books and records of all receipts, income, and expenditures of such funds. The commission and its designees shall be authorized to inspect and make abstracts of records of services provided to victims of crimes by any victim assistance program, including programs operated by public officers, that receives funds pursuant to Article 8 of Chapter 21 of Title 15, provided that the commission and its designees shall not disclose the content of individually identifiable records that contain information that is privileged or confidential under the laws of this state or federal law.

History.

Code 1981, §

35-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, Ex. Sess., p. ES3, § 25.